Illinois, session 104th, HB4182.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Airport Authorities Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3, 3.1, and 3.2 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 5/3)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.3)7    Sec. 3. Boards of commissioners. Every authority 8established under this Act shall be governed by a board of 9commissioners. For authorities other than Metropolitan Airport 10Authorities, the Greater Metropolitan Airport Authority, and 11the Crawford County Airport Authority, in the order finding 12the results of the election to be favorable to the 13establishment of the authority, the circuit court shall 14determine the population of the authority and the population 15of each municipality located in whole or in part within the 16corporate limits of the authority having 5,000 or more 17inhabitants who reside within the corporate limits of the 18authority according to the last census.19(Source: P.A. 95-365, eff. 1-1-08.) 20    (70 ILCS 5/3.1)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.3a)21    Sec. 3.1. Boards of commissioners - Appointment. The 22Boards of Commissioners of Authorities shall be appointed as   HB4182- 2 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1follows:2    (1) In case there are one or more municipalities having a 3population of 5,000 or more within the Authority, the 4commissioners shall be appointed as follows: 5        (a) Where there is only one such municipality, 3 6    commissioners shall be appointed from such municipality, 7    and 2 commissioners shall be appointed at large.8        (a-5) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 9    amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, one 10    additional commissioner shall be appointed to the board of 11    the Springfield Airport Authority from each municipality 12    having a population of 5,000 or more within the Authority, 13    and one additional commissioner shall be appointed at 14    large. The additional commissioners shall serve for a term 15    of 4 or 5 years, as determined by lot. Their successors 16    shall serve for terms of 5 years. 17        (b) Where there are 2 or more such municipalities, one 18    commissioner shall be appointed from each municipality 19    with a population between 5,000 and 45,000, 2 20    commissioners shall be appointed from each municipality 21    with a population of more than 45,000, and 3 commissioners 22    shall be appointed at large; except that when the physical 23    facilities of the airport of the Authority are located 24    wholly within a single county with a population between 25    600,000 and 3,000,000 there shall be one commissioner 26    appointed from each municipality within the corporate   HB4182- 3 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1    limits of the Authority having 5,000 or more population 2    and 5 commissioners appointed at large. If the Authority 3    is located wholly within the corporate limits of such 4    municipalities, 2 commissioners shall be appointed from 5    the one of such municipalities having the largest 6    population, and one commissioner shall be appointed from 7    each of the other such municipalities, and 2 commissioners 8    shall be appointed at large. 9        (c) Commissioners representing the area within an 10    Authority located outside of any municipality having 5,000 11    or more population and commissioners appointed at large 12    when the authority is wholly contained within a single 13    county shall be appointed by the presiding officer of the 14    county board with the advice and consent of the county 15    board, and when the physical facilities of the airport of 16    the Authority are located wholly within a single county 17    with a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000 the 18    commissioners appointed at large shall be appointed by the 19    chairman of the county board of such county, and any 20    commissioner representing the area within any such 21    municipality shall be appointed by its mayor or the 22    presiding officer of its governing body. If however the 23    district is located in more than one county other than a 24    county with a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000, 25    the members of the General Assembly whose legislative 26    districts encompass any portion of the Authority shall   HB4182- 4 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1    appoint the commissioners representing the area within an 2    Authority located outside of any municipality having 5,000 3    or more population and commissioners at large but any 4    commissioner representing the area within any such 5    municipality shall be appointed by its mayor or the 6    presiding officer of its governing body. 7        (d) A commissioner representing the area within any 8    such municipality shall reside within its corporate 9    limits. A commissioner appointed at large may reside 10    either within or without any such municipality but must 11    reside within the territory of the authority. Should any 12    commissioner cease to reside within that part of the 13    territory he represents, or should the territory in which 14    he resides cease to be a part of the authority, then his 15    office shall be deemed vacated, and shall be filled by 16    appointment for the remainder of the term as hereinafter 17    provided.18    (2) In case there are no municipalities having a 19population of 5,000 or more within such authority located 20wholly within a single county, such order shall so find, and in 21such case the Board shall consist of 5 commissioners who shall 22be appointed at large by the presiding officer of the county 23board with the advice and consent of the county board. If 24however the district is located in more than one county, the 25members of the General Assembly whose legislative districts 26encompass any portion of the Authority shall appoint the   HB4182- 5 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1commissioners at large.2    (3) Should a municipality located in whole or in part 3within the corporate limits of the authority attain 5,000 or 4more inhabitants who reside within the corporate limits of the 5authority which is wholly within an authority attain, or 6should such a municipality be established, having a population 7with of 5,000 or more inhabitants who reside within the 8corporate limits of the authority after the entry of said 9order by the circuit court, then the presiding officer of such 10municipality may petition the circuit court for an order 11finding and determining the population of such municipality 12and, if it is found and determined upon the hearing of said 13petition that 5,000 or more inhabitants reside within the 14corporate limits of both the municipality and the authority 15the population of such municipality is 5,000 or more, then the 16board of commissioners of such authority as previously 17established shall be increased by one commissioner who shall 18reside within the corporate limits of such municipality and 19shall be appointed by its presiding officer. The initial 20commissioner so appointed shall serve for a term of 1, 2, 3, 4 21or 5 years, as may be determined by lot, and his successors 22shall be similarly appointed and shall serve for terms of 5 23years. All provisions of this section applicable to 24commissioners representing municipal areas shall apply to any 25such commissioner. Each such commissioner shall reside within 26the corporate limits of the authority and shall continue to   HB4182- 6 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1reside therein.2    (4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section, 3the Board of Commissioners of a Metropolitan Airport Authority 4shall consist of 9 commissioners.5    Seven commissioners shall be residents of the county with 6a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000 within which the 7Metropolitan Airport Authority was established. These 8commissioners shall be appointed by the county board chairman 9of the county with a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000 10within which the Metropolitan Airport Authority was 11established, with the advice and consent of the county board 12of that county.13    Two commissioners shall be residents of the territory of 14the Authority located outside the county with a population 15between 600,000 and 3,000,000. These commissioners shall be 16appointed jointly by the mayors of the municipalities having a 17population over 5,000 that are located outside the county with 18a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000, with the advice 19and consent of the governing bodies of those municipalities.20    The transition from the pre-existing composition of the 21Metropolitan Airport Authority Board of Commissioners to the 22composition specified in this amendatory Act of 1991 shall be 23accomplished as follows: 24        (A) The appointee who was required to be a resident of 25    the area outside of the county with a population between 26    600,000 and 3,000,000 may serve until his or her term   HB4182- 7 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1    expires. The replacement shall be one of the 2 appointees 2    who shall be residents of the territory of the Authority 3    located outside the county with a population between 4    600,000 and 3,000,000. 5        (B) The other 8 commissioners may serve until their 6    terms expire. Upon the occurrence of the second vacancy 7    among these 8 commissioners after the effective date of 8    this amendatory Act of 1991, the replacement shall be the 9    second of the 2 appointees who shall be residents of the 10    territory of the Authority located outside of the county 11    with a population between 600,000 and 3,000,000. Upon the 12    expiration of the terms of the other 7 commissioners, the 13    replacements shall be residents of the county with a 14    population between 600,000 and 3,000,000. 15        (C) All commissioners appointed after the effective 16    date of this amendatory Act of 1991, and their successors, 17    shall be appointed in the manner set forth in this 18    amendatory Act of 1991.19(Source: P.A. 94-466, eff. 1-1-06; 95-641, eff. 10-11-07.) 20    (70 ILCS 5/3.2)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.3b)21    Sec. 3.2. Manner of exercising appointments. All 22appointments of Commissioners to Boards of Commissioners of 23Airport Authorities shall be in writing and shall indicate the 24legal residence of the person appointed and whether or not he 25resides within or without a municipality having a population   HB4182- 8 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1of 5,000 or more inhabitants within the corporate limits of 2the authority.3(Source: P.A. 77-685.)  HB4182- 9 -LRB104 15600 RTM 28767 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    70 ILCS 5/3from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.34    70 ILCS 5/3.1from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.3a5    70 ILCS 5/3.2from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 68.3b